Hawaii statutes.
[§87A-43] Payment of public employer
contributions to the other post-employment benefits trust. (a) Commencing
with fiscal year 2018-2019, each of the counties and all other public employers
shall make annual required contributions in accordance with section 87A-42 for
the benefit of their retirees and beneficiaries.

(b) The board shall determine the annual
required contribution owed by each public employer under this part for each
fiscal year, beginning with fiscal year 2018-2019. [L 2013, c 268, pt of §6]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next